Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.010

Definitions.

When used in this chapter and RCW 47.68.250 and 82.48.100:

(1) "Person" includes a firm, partnership, or corporation;

(2) "Dealer" means a person engaged in the business of selling, exchanging, or acting as a broker of aircraft or who offers for sale two or more aircraft within a calendar year;

(3) "Aircraft" means any weight-carrying device or structure for navigation of the air, designed to be supported by the air, but which is heavier than air and is mechanically driven;

(4) "Secretary" means the secretary of the state department of transportation.

[ 1993 c 208 s 1; 1984 c 7 s 9; 1955 c 150 s 1.]